Missouri, session 2026, HB2159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto fifteen new sections, to
be known as sections 324.1900, 324.1905, 324.1910, 324.1915, 324.1920, 324.1925,
324.1930, 324.1935, 324.1940, 324.1945, 324.1950, 324.1955, 324.1960, 324.1965, and
324.1970, to read as follows:
324.1900. Sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Naturopathic Practice Act".
324.1905. As used in sections 324.1900 to 324.1970, the following terms mean:
(1) "Approved naturopathic medical education program", an education
program that the board has approved as meeting the requirements of section
324.1930 and that prepares naturopathic doctors for the practice of naturopathic
medicine;
(2) "Board", the board of naturopathic medicine;
(3) "Common diagnostic procedure", any diagnostic procedure commonly
performed by health care professionals including, but not limited to, the following
diagnostic procedures:
(a) Taking and recording a patient's health history;
(b) Performing a physical examination;
(c) Performing venipuncture;
(d) Ordering, but not interpreting, radiography examinations;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2159 2
(e) Performing laboratory medicine; and
(f) Obtaining samples of human tissues, except surgical excision beyond surgical
excision that is authorized as a minor office procedure;
(4) "Controlled substance", a drug, substance, or immediate precursor
enumerated in Schedules I through V of section 195.017;
(5) "Division", the division of professional registration of the department of
commerce and insurance;
(6) "Drug", the same meaning given to the term in section 195.010;
(7) "Laboratory medicine", the collection and analysis of body fluids to provide
information to help aid the diagnosis and treatment of patients;
(8) "Legend drug", the same meaning given to the term in section 338.330;
(9) "License", a license issued by the board to an individual in accordance with
sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 and rules of the board authorizing that individual to
practice naturopathic medicine in this state;
(10) "Licensee", an individual who holds a license to practice naturopathic
medicine;
(11) "Minor office procedure", any minor office procedure including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) Care and procedures incident thereto of superficial lacerations, lesions, or
abrasions and the removal of foreign bodies located in superficial structures, not to
include the eye;
(b) The use of antiseptics and topical or local anesthetics in connection with the
procedures described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(c) Intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous, and intradermal injections of
substances consistent with the practice of naturopathic medicine;
(d) Trigger point therapy;
(e) The use of noninvasive and minimally invasive aesthetic lasers that cannot be
used for major surgeries or cutting;
(f) Dermal stimulation; and
(g) Allergy testing.

The definition of "minor office procedures" does not include general anesthetics or
surgery;
(12) "Naturopathic doctor", an individual licensed in this state to practice
naturopathic medicine as a naturopathic doctor in accordance with sections 324.1900 to
324.1970;

HB 2159 3
(13) "Naturopathic medicine", a system of health care for the prevention,
diagnosis, and treatment of human health conditions, injury, and disease; the promotion
or restoration of health; and the support and stimulation of a patient's inherent self-
healing processes through patient education and the use of naturopathic therapies;
(14) "Naturopathic physical medicine", the use of one or more of the following
physical agents or treatments in a manner consistent with naturopathic medical practice
on a part or the whole of the body, by hand or by mechanical means, in the resolution of
a human ailment or condition: air, water, heat, cold, sound, light, electromagnetism,
nondiagnostic ultrasound, cold laser, colon hydrotherapy, soft tissue therapy, joint
mobilization, therapeutic exercise, and treatments taught in any approved naturopathic
medical education program that are not otherwise prohibited by sections 324.1900 to
324.1970;
(15) "Naturopathic therapies", any of the following exemplified in a standard
naturopathic medical text, journal, or pharmacopeia: food; extracts of food; vitamins;
minerals; nutraceuticals; oxygen; botanicals; enzymes; amino acids; homeopathics;
hormones; hormonal or pharmaceutical contraceptives; all dietary supplements and
nonprescription drugs as defined by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21
U.S.C. Section 301 et seq.; human cellular and tissue-based products that are not
regulated as drugs; such legend drugs and controlled substances that are consistent with
naturopathic medical practice; and any other physiologic substances;
(16) "Nutritional counseling", the prevention and treatment of disease or other
human conditions through the use of food, water, herbs, roots, bark, or natural food
elements;
(17) "Prescription", the same meaning given to the term in section 338.095;
(18) "Professional examination", a competency-based national licensing
examination administered by the North American Board of Naturopathic Examiners
or its successor agency, which board has been nationally recognized to administer a
naturopathic examination that represents federal standards of education and training;
(19) "Radiography", radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies
including, but not limited to, x-ray, diagnostic ultrasound, mammogram, bone
densitometry, computed tomography, positron emission tomography, and magnetic
resonance imaging;
(20) "Therapeutic device", an instrument or an apparatus intended for use in
diagnosis or treatment and in the prevention of disease or maintenance or restoration of
health.
324.1910. 1. There is hereby created within the division a board to be known as
the "Board of Naturopathic Medicine".

HB 2159 4
2. The board of naturopathic medicine shall consist of five members appointed
by the governor, all of whom shall be residents of this state. Three members shall be
naturopathic doctors as described in subsection 5 of this section, one member shall be a
physician licensed under chapter 334, and one member shall be a public member as
described in subsection 6 of this section.
3. The initial members of the board shall be appointed for staggered terms, the
longest of which shall not exceed four years. Following the initial appointments, all
terms shall be for three years, and no member of the board shall serve more than three
terms.
4. The initial physician member licensed under chapter 334 shall have at least
four years of experience in the practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine.
5. (1) The initial three naturopathic doctor members shall each have at least
four years of experience in the practice of naturopathic medicine and shall each be
eligible to become licensed under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970.
(2) Any naturopathic doctor member appointed following the initial
appointments to the board shall be licensed under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 and
shall actively practice naturopathic medicine in this state for the duration of his or her
appointment.
6. The public member shall be, at the time of the member's appointment, a
citizen of the United States, a resident of this state for a period of at least one year, and a
registered voter. The public member shall not have been a member of any profession
licensed or regulated under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 or an immediate family
member of such a person. The public member shall not have had a material financial
interest in the provision of naturopathic medicine or in an activity or organization
directly related to any profession licensed or regulated under sections 324.1900 to
324.1970. The duties of the public member shall not include any determination of the
technical requirements to be met for licensure or whether any candidate for licensure
meets such technical requirements or any determination of the technical competence or
technical judgment of a licensee or candidate for licensure.
7. In the event of death, resignation, or removal of any member of the board
before the expiration of the term to which he or she was appointed, the vacancy shall be
filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original
appointment.
8. The board shall, within thirty days after the appointment of all members, and
at least annually thereafter, hold a meeting and elect from its membership a chair, a vice
chair, and a secretary. The board may hold additional meetings as may be required in
the performance of its duties at the call of the chair or upon the written request of any

HB 2159 5
two members of the board. Notice of every meeting shall be given to each member at
least three days before the date of the meeting.
9. The board may appoint such committees as it considers necessary to carry out
its duties.
10. A quorum of the board shall consist of a majority of its voting members. The
affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board shall be required to carry a
motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.
11. The governor may remove a board member for misconduct, incompetence,
or neglect of official duties after giving the board member written notice of the charges
and an opportunity to be heard.
12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any appointed member of the
board shall receive as compensation an amount established by the director of the
division, not to exceed seventy-five dollars per member per day for commission business
plus actual and necessary expenses including, but not limited to, travel expenses. The
director of the division shall establish by rule guidelines for payment. All staff for the
board shall be provided by the division.
324.1915. 1. The board shall adopt rules that are necessary or proper for the
administration of sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 including, but not limited to, rules on:
(1) Regulating the licensure of naturopathic doctors and determining the hours
of continuing education units required for maintaining licensure as a naturopathic
doctor;
(2) Establishing the manner in which records of examinations and treatments
shall be kept and maintained;
(3) Establishing standards for professional responsibility and conduct;
(4) Identifying disciplinary actions and circumstances that require disciplinary
action;
(5) Developing a means to provide information to all licensees in the state;
(6) Providing for the investigation of complaints against licensees or persons
holding themselves out as naturopathic doctors in this state;
(7) Providing for the publication of information for the public about licensees
and the practice of naturopathic medicine in this state;
(8) Providing for an orderly process for reinstatement of a license;
(9) Establishing criteria for advertising or promotional materials;
(10) Establishing continuing education requirements related to hours and
acceptable content;
(11) Establishing standards for the state jurisprudence examination;

HB 2159 6
(12) Establishing procedures and standards for reviewing licensing examination
scores;
(13) Establishing procedures for reviewing transcripts demonstrating
completion of the approved naturopathic medical education program;
(14) Establishing the requirements for issuance and renewal of licenses; and
(15) Regulating any other matter necessary to implement sections 324.1900 to
324.1970.
2. The board shall establish and maintain a list of naturopathic medical
education programs that meet the requirements of section 324.1930.
3. The board shall administer and enforce all provisions of sections 324.1900 to
324.1970 and all rules adopted by the board under the authority granted in sections
324.1900 to 324.1970.
4. The board shall set the amount of the fees that sections 324.1900 to 324.1970
authorize and require by rules and regulations promulgated under section 536.021. The
fees shall be set at a level to produce revenue that shall not substantially exceed the cost
and expense of administering sections 324.1900 to 324.1970.
5. All fees payable under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 shall be collected by the
division and transmitted to the department of revenue for deposit in the state treasury
to the credit of the board of naturopathic medicine fund established under section
324.1920.
6. The board shall employ permanent or temporary personnel it deems
necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 and designate their
duties.
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
324.1920. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Board of
Naturopathic Medicine Fund". All fees authorized to be charged by the board shall be
collected by the director of the division and shall be transmitted to the department of
revenue for deposit in the state treasury for credit to this fund. The state treasurer shall
be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon

HB 2159 7
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely in payment of expenses of
maintaining the board and for the enforcement of the provisions of law concerning the
practice of naturopathic medicine.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in
this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of general revenue until the
amount in the fund at the end of the biennium exceeds three times the amount of the
appropriation from the fund for the preceding fiscal year. The amount, if any, in the
fund that shall lapse is that amount in the fund that exceeds the appropriate multiple of
the appropriations from the fund for the preceding fiscal year.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
324.1925. The board shall issue a license to an applicant who:
(1) Is of good moral character, in accordance with standards established by rules
of the board;
(2) Submits, in accordance with rules of the board, the following items to the
board:
(a) An application for licensure designed and approved by the board and
submitted in accordance with rules of the board;
(b) An application fee submitted in an amount and manner established by rules
of the board;
(c) Evidence that the applicant has graduated from an approved naturopathic
medical education program;
(d) Evidence that the applicant has successfully completed a professional
examination or, for graduates of approved naturopathic medical education programs in
the United States prior to the existence of the Council on Naturopathic Medical
Education, a competency-based state naturopathic medicine licensing examination or
equivalent Canadian provincial licensing examination for the practice of naturopathic
medicine approved by the board;
(e) Evidence that the applicant has passed a pharmacy examination authorized
by rules of the board and administered by the North American Board of Naturopathic
Examiners;
(f) Evidence that the applicant has passed a state jurisprudence examination
that meets standards established in rules of the board; and
(g) Evidence of professional liability insurance;
(3) Is determined by the board to be physically and mentally capable of safely
practicing naturopathic medicine with or without reasonable accommodation; and

HB 2159 8
(4) Has not had a license to practice naturopathic medicine or other health care
license, registration, or certificate refused, revoked, or suspended by any other
jurisdiction for reasons that relate to the applicant's ability to skillfully and safely
practice naturopathic medicine unless that license, registration, or certification has been
restored to good standing by that jurisdiction.
324.1930. 1. The board shall establish by rule guidelines for the licensure
requirements described in section 324.1925 relating to graduation from an approved
naturopathic medical education program. The guidelines shall meet the requirements of
this section and the board's specifications for the education of naturopathic doctors.
2. The requirement for graduation from an approved naturopathic medical
education program shall be interpreted in the guidelines as requiring, at a minimum,
graduation from:
(1) A naturopathic medical education program in the United States providing
the degree of doctor of naturopathic medicine, which shall:
(a) Offer graduate-level, full-time didactic and supervised clinical training;
(b) Be accredited or have achieved candidacy status for accreditation by the
Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally recognized
accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs also recognized by the board; and
(c) Be an institution of higher education or part of an institution of higher
education that is either accredited or is a candidate for accreditation by a regional or
national institutional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Secretary of
Education;
(2) A degree-granting institution of higher education that, prior to the existence
of the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education, offered a full-time, structured
curriculum in basic sciences and supervised patient care comprising a doctoral
naturopathic medical education requiring not less than one hundred thirty-two weeks of
coursework to be completed within a period of not less than thirty-five months, which
was reputable and in good standing in the judgment of the board and which if still in
existence has current programmatic accreditation by the Council on Naturopathic
Medical Education or a federally recognized equivalent accrediting agency;
(3) A diploma-granting, degree-equivalent institution of higher education
located in Canada that, prior to the existence of the Council on Naturopathic Medical
Education, had provincial approval for participation in government-funded student aid
programs, offered a full-time, structured curriculum in basic sciences and supervised
patient care comprising a doctoral naturopathic medical education requiring not less
than one hundred thirty-two weeks of coursework to be completed within a period of
not less than thirty months, was reputable and in good standing in the judgment of the

HB 2159 9
board, and if still in existence, has current programmatic accreditation by the Council
on Naturopathic Medical Education or a federally recognized equivalent accrediting
agency and currently has provincial approval for participation in government-funded
student aid programs; or
(4) A diploma-granting, degree-equivalent institution of higher education
located in Canada that has provincial approval for participation in government-funded
student aid programs, offers graduate-level, full-time didactic and supervised clinical
training, and is accredited or has achieved candidacy status for accreditation by the
Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent federally recognized
accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs also recognized by the board.
324.1935. 1. A person who holds a license under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970
shall display the licensee's license in the licensee's place of business in a location clearly
visible to the licensee's patients and shall also display evidence of the licensee having
completed an approved naturopathic medical education program.
2. A person who practices, conducts affairs, or is employed at more than one
location and who maintains a continuing activity as authorized by the license shall
display a duplicate of such document issued by the board at each location.
324.1940. A licensee may practice naturopathic medicine to provide primary
care in alignment with naturopathic medical education by:
(1) Performing common diagnostic procedures;
(2) Administering, dispensing, and ordering naturopathic therapies;
(3) Recommending, prescribing, administering, dispensing, and ordering:
(a) All legend drugs and over-the-counter drugs;
(b) Controlled substances within Schedules III, IV, and V of section 195.017,
excluding all opioids and opioid derivatives; and
(c) Durable medical equipment and devices;
(4) Administering substances authorized for intradermal, subcutaneous,
intramuscular, intravenous, ligamentous, tendinous, periarticular, intra-articular,
intravaginal, and intrauterine administration consistent with the education and
training of a naturopathic doctor;
(5) Performing naturopathic physical medicine;
(6) Recommending, ordering, and using therapeutic devices;
(7) Recommending, ordering, and using barrier contraception and contraceptive
devices, including intrauterine devices;
(8) Performing minor office procedures;
(9) Providing biofeedback and neurofeedback therapies; and

HB 2159 10
(10) Providing health care counseling, nutritional counseling, and dietary
therapy.
324.1945. A naturopathic doctor who prescribes in accordance with section
324.1940 shall:
(1) Record each prescription order in writing, which may include an
electronically recorded and transmitted communication. The order shall include the
name, address, and telephone number of the naturopathic doctor;
(2) Prescribe only when the naturopathic doctor has adequate education,
training, and experience to safely manage the medical regimen; and
(3) Register with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) in
order to prescribe controlled substances authorized by sections 324.1900 to 324.1970.
324.1950. A licensee shall refer to a physician licensed and authorized to engage
in the practice of medicine as described in section 334.010 any patient whose medical
condition should, at the time of evaluation or treatment, be determined to be beyond the
scope of practice of the licensee.
324.1955. A licensee shall not:
(1) Perform major surgery;
(2) Use general or spinal anesthetics;
(3) Administer ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic purposes;
(4) Perform a surgical procedure using a laser device;
(5) Perform a surgical procedure involving any of the following areas of the body
that extends beyond superficial tissue: eyes, ears, tendons, nerves, veins, or arteries;
(6) Perform a surgical or medical abortion;
(7) Treat any lesion suspected of malignancy or requiring surgical removal;
(8) Practice chiropractic medicine;
(9) Practice acupuncture; or
(10) Practice physical therapy.
324.1960. Nothing in sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 shall be construed to prohibit
or to restrict:
(1) The practice of a health care profession by an individual who is licensed,
certified, or registered under other laws of this state and who is performing services
within the individual's authorized scope of practice;
(2) The practice of naturopathic medicine by a student enrolled in an approved
naturopathic medical education program, provided that the practice of naturopathic
medicine by a student is performed as specified by a course of instruction or an
assignment from an instructor and under the supervision of an instructor who is a
licensee or a duly licensed professional in the instructed field;

HB 2159 11
(3) Any person who sells a vitamin or herb from providing information about
the vitamin or herb;
(4) The practice of naturopathic medicine by persons who are licensed to
practice in any other state or district in the United States and who enter this state to
consult with a naturopathic doctor of this state, provided that the consultation is limited
to examination, recommendation, or testimony in litigation; or
(5) Any person or practitioner who is not licensed as a naturopathic doctor from
recommending ayurvedic medicine, herbal remedies, nutritional advice, homeopathy, or
other therapy that is within the scope of practice of naturopathic medicine, provided
that the person or practitioner shall not:
(a) Use a title protected under section 324.1965;
(b) Represent or assume the character or appearance of a licensee; or
(c) Otherwise use a name, title, or other designation that indicates or implies that
the person is a licensee.
324.1965. 1. A licensee shall use the title "naturopathic physician" or
"naturopathic doctor" and the recognized abbreviation "N.D.".
2. A licensee has the exclusive right to use the following terms in reference to the
licensee's self: "naturopathic physician", "naturopathic doctor", "doctor of
naturopathic medicine", "N.D.", "ND", "NMD", and "N.M.D.".
3. An individual represents the individual's self to be a naturopathic physician or
a naturopathic doctor when the individual uses or adopts any of the following terms in
reference to the individual's self: "naturopathic physician", "naturopathic doctor",
"doctor of naturopathic medicine", "N.D.", "ND", "NMD", and "N.M.D.".
4. An individual shall not represent the individual's self to the public as a
naturopathic physician, a naturopathic doctor, or a doctor of naturopathic medicine, or
as being otherwise authorized to practice naturopathic medicine in this state, unless the
individual is a licensee.
324.1970. 1. The board may refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate any license
required by sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 for one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The board shall notify the applicant in writing of the
reasons for the refusal and shall advise the applicant of his or her right to file a
complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided in chapter 621.
2. The board may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of a license issued under
sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered
his or her license for any one or any combination of the following causes:

HB 2159 12
(1) The person has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country for any offense directly related to the duties and
responsibilities of the occupation, as set forth in section 324.012, regardless of whether a
sentence is imposed;
(2) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing any license
issued under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 or in obtaining permission to take any
examination given or required under sections 324.1900 to 324.1970;
(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge, tuition, or other
compensation by fraud, deception, or misrepresentation;
(4) Incompetency, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud, misrepresentation, or
dishonesty in the performance of the functions or duties of the profession regulated by
sections 324.1900 to 324.1970;
(5) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate, any provision of
sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 or of any lawful rule or regulation adopted under sections
324.1900 to 324.1970;
(6) Impersonation of any person holding a license or allowing any other person
to use his or her diploma from any school;
(7) Disciplinary action against the holder of a license or other right to practice
the profession regulated by sections 324.1900 to 324.1970 granted by another state,
territory, federal agency, or country upon grounds for which revocation or suspension is
authorized in this state;
(8) A person is finally adjudged insane or incompetent by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(9) Issuance of a license based upon a material mistake of fact; or
(10) Use of any advertisement or solicitation that is false, misleading, or
deceptive to the general public or persons to whom the advertisement or solicitation is
primarily directed.
3. Any person, organization, association, or corporation that reports or provides
information to the board or division in accordance with the provisions of sections
324.1900 to 324.1970 and that does so in good faith and without negligence shall not be
subject to an action for civil damages as a result thereof.
4. After the filing of a complaint under subsection 2 of this section, the
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon
a finding by the administrative hearing commission that one or more of the grounds for
disciplinary action provided in subsection 2 of this section are met, the board may,
singly or in combination, censure or place the person named in the complaint on

HB 2159 13
probation or suspension or revoke the license of the person on such terms and
conditions as the board deems appropriate.
✔